Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-116. Appointment in domestic relations cases - representation of the best interests of the child - legal representative of the child - disclosure - short title.

The court may, upon the motion of either party or upon its own motion, appoint an attorney, in good standing and licensed to practice law in the state of Colorado, to serve as the legal representative of the child, representing the best interests of the child in any domestic relations proceeding that involves allocation of parental responsibilities. In no instance may the same person serve as both the child's legal representative pursuant to this section and as the child and family investigator for the court pursuant to section 14-10-116.5. Within seven days after the appointment, the appointed person shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (2.5) of this section.

The legal representative of the child, appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, shall represent the best interests of the minor or dependent child, as described in section 14-10-124, with respect to the parenting time, the allocation of parental responsibilities, financial support for the child, the child's property, or any other issue related to the child that is identified by the legal representative of the child or the appointing court. The legal representative of the child shall actively participate in all aspects of the case involving the child, within the bounds of the law. The legal representative of the child shall comply with the provisions set forth in the Colorado rules of professional conduct and any applicable provisions set forth in chief justice directives or other practice standards established by rule or directive of the chief justice pursuant to section 13-91-105 (1)(c) concerning the duties or responsibilities of best interest representation in legal matters affecting children, including training requirements related to domestic violence and its effect on children, adults, and families. The legal representative of the child shall not be called as a witness in the case. While the legal representative of the child shall ascertain and consider the wishes of the child, the legal representative of the child is not required to adopt the child's wishes in the legal representative of the child's recommendation or advocacy for the child unless such wishes serve the best interests of the child, as described in section 14-10-124.

The short title of this subsection (2) is "Julie's Law".

(2.5) (a) Within seven days after his or her appointment, the appointed person shall disclose to each party, attorneys of record, and the court any familial, financial, or social relationship that the appointed person has or has had with the child, either party, the attorneys of record, or the judicial officer and, if a relationship exists, the nature of the relationship.

Based on the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5), the court may, in its discretion, terminate the appointment and appoint a different person in the proceedings. A party has seven days from the date of the disclosure to object to the appointment based upon information contained in the disclosure. If a party objects to the appointment, the court shall appoint a different person or confirm the appointment within seven days after the date of the party's objection. If no party timely objects to the appointment, then the appointment is deemed confirmed.

The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and disbursements in favor of the child's legal representative appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The order shall be made against any or all of the parties; except that, if the responsible parties are determined to be indigent, the costs, fees, and disbursements shall be borne by the state.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, prior to the entry of a decree of dissolution or legal separation, the court shall not enter an order requiring the state to bear the costs, fees, or disbursements related to the appointment of a child's legal representative unless both parties are determined to be indigent after considering the combined income and assets of the parties.

If the appointment of a child's legal representative occurs in a case involving unmarried parties, including those proceedings that occur after the entry of a decree for dissolution of marriage or of legal separation, the court shall make every reasonable effort to apportion costs between the parties in a manner that will minimize the costs, fees, and disbursements that shall be borne by the state.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 527, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-16.

L. 73:

p. 554, § 8.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section R&RE, p. 32, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1399, § 43, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1773, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 958, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-268), ch. 207, p. 941, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 12-056), ch. 108, p. 367, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1228), ch. 292, p. 1729, § 3, effective June 22.

Editor's note:

The duties of a special advocate, as formerly set out in subsection (2), were similar to the guidelines for the child and family investigator as set forth in section 14-10-116.5.

Cross references:

(1) For the duty of the public defender to represent indigents, see §§ 21-1-103 and 21-1-104.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declarations contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see sections 1 and 3 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1228, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-116.5. Appointment in domestic relations cases - child and family investigator - disclosure - background check.

The court may, upon the motion of either party or upon its own motion, appoint a neutral third person to serve the court as a child and family investigator pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in a domestic relations proceeding that involves allocation of parental responsibilities. The court shall set forth the specific duties of the child and family investigator in a written order of appointment. The same person may not serve as both the legal representative of the child pursuant to section 14-10-116 and as the child and family investigator for the court pursuant to this section. Within seven days after the appointment, the appointed person shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (2.5) of this section.

A child and family investigator appointed by the court from an eligibility roster established pursuant to chief justice directive may be an attorney, a mental health professional, or any other individual with appropriate training and qualifications, as set forth in subsection (2)(f) of this section, and an independent perspective acceptable to the court. The child and family investigator for the court shall investigate and report as specifically directed by the court in the appointment order, taking into consideration the relevant factors for determining the best interests of the child, as described in section 14-10-124. The purpose of the investigation is to assist in determining the best interests of the child, with the child's safety always paramount.

The child and family investigator shall make independent and informed recommendations to the court, in the form of a written report with the court, unless otherwise ordered by the court. While the child and family investigator shall consider the wishes of the child, the child and family investigator need not adopt such wishes in making his or her recommendations to the court, unless they serve the best interests of the child, as described in section 14-10-124. The child's wishes, if expressed, must be disclosed in the child and family investigator's written report. The court shall consider the entirety of the report, as well as any testimony by the child and family investigator, the parties, and any other professionals, before adopting any recommendations made by the child and family investigator.

The child and family investigator may be called to testify as a court-appointed expert witness regarding the child and family investigator's reports, but only if the court finds that the child and family investigator has the appropriate training and qualifications set forth in subsection (2)(f) of this section. Recommendations should be considered in full context of the report.

In addition to the training requirements and qualifications set forth in subsection (2)(f) of this section, the child and family investigator shall comply with applicable provisions set forth in chief justice directives, and any other practice or ethical standards established by rule, statute, or any licensing board that regulates the child and family investigator. A child and family investigator shall strive to engage in culturally informed and nondiscriminatory practices.

A party wishing to file a complaint related to a person's duties as a child and family investigator shall file such complaint in accordance with the applicable provisions in chief justice directives.

The court shall not appoint a person from the eligibility registry to be a child and family investigator for a case pursuant to this section unless the court finds that the person is qualified as competent by training and experience in, at a minimum, domestic violence and its effects on children, adults, and families, child abuse, and child sexual abuse. The person's training and experience must be provided by recognized sources with expertise in domestic violence and the traumatic effects of domestic violence. As of January 1, 2022, initial and ongoing training must include, at a minimum:

Six initial hours of training on domestic violence, including coercive control, and its traumatic effects on children, adults, and families;

Six initial hours of training on child abuse and child sexual abuse and its traumatic effects; and

Four subsequent hours of training every two years on domestic violence, including coercive control, child abuse, and child sexual abuse, and the traumatic effects on children, adults, and families.

(2.5) (a) Within seven days after his or her appointment, the appointed person shall disclose to each party, attorneys of record, and the court any familial, financial, or social relationship that the appointed person has or has had with the child, either party, the attorneys of record, or the judicial officer and, if a relationship exists, the nature of the relationship.

Based on the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5), the court may, in its discretion, terminate the appointment and appoint a different person in the proceedings. A party has seven days from the date of the disclosure to object to the appointment based upon information contained in the disclosure. If a party objects to the appointment, the court shall appoint a different person or confirm the appointment within seven days after the date of the party's objection. If no party timely objects to the appointment, then the appointment is deemed confirmed.

The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and disbursements in favor of the child and family investigator appointed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The order must be made against any or all of the parties; except that, if the responsible parties are determined to be indigent, the costs, fees, and disbursements are borne by the state.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, prior to the entry of a decree of dissolution or legal separation, the court shall not enter an order requiring the state to bear the costs, fees, or disbursements related to the appointment of a child and family investigator unless both parties are determined to be indigent after considering the combined income and assets of the parties.

If the appointment of a child and family investigator occurs in a case involving unmarried parties, including those proceedings that occur after the entry of a decree for dissolution of marriage or of legal separation, the court shall make every reasonable effort to apportion costs between the parties in a manner that will minimize the costs, fees, and disbursements that shall be borne by the state.

Prior to being appointed as a child and family investigator, the person shall submit a complete set of his or her fingerprints to the judicial department for the purposes of a background check, and the judicial department shall determine based on the background check whether the person is suitable to act as a child and family investigator. The department shall forward such fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The department is the authorized agency to receive information regarding the result of a national fingerprint-based criminal history record check.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of a person performed pursuant to this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department shall require that applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). Upon request of the department pursuant to this section, the applicant shall provide a name-based judicial record check.

The applicant shall pay the cost associated with the background check.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 960, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-268), ch. 207, p. 942, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 12-056), ch. 108, p. 368, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(4) added, (SB 14-027), ch. 146, p. 496, § 2, effective May 2.

L. 2019:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 544, § 18, effective April 18.

L. 2021:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, (HB 21-1228), ch. 292, p. 1730, § 4, effective June 22.

L. 2022:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 518, § 19, effective April 21.

Cross references:

For the legislative declarations contained in the 2005 act enacting this section, see sections 1 and 3 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1228, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-117. Payment of maintenance or child support.

Upon its own motion or upon motion of either party, the court may at any time order that maintenance or child support payments be made to the clerk of the court or, if the executive director of the department of human services has notified the state court administrator that the judicial district issuing the order is ready to participate in the family support registry pursuant to section 26-13-114 (5), C.R.S., and, for payments for maintenance obligations, the family support registry is ready to accept maintenance payments, through the family support registry, as trustee, for remittance to the person entitled to receive the payments. The court may not order payments to be made to the clerk of the court once payments may be made through the family support registry. The payments shall be due on a certain date or dates of each month. If the support payments are required under this section, title 19, C.R.S., or section 26-13-114 (1), C.R.S., to be made through the family support registry, the court shall order that payments be made through the registry in accordance with the procedures specified in section 26-13-114, C.R.S.

The clerk of the court shall maintain records listing the amount of payments, the date when payments are required to be made, and the names and addresses of the parties affected by the order for those payments he or she receives through the court registry.

If payments are to be made through the family support registry, the parties affected by the order shall inform the family support registry, and if payments are to be made through the court registry, the parties affected by the order shall inform the clerk of the court of any change of address or of other conditions that may affect the administration of the order.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 756, § 6, effective July 1, 1998.)

Repealed.

In cases in which a party is ordered to make payments through the court registry, upon receipt of a verified notice of a support obligation assigned to the state, the clerk of the court shall, without further action by the court, pay the support to the county child support enforcement unit rather than to the obligee. When the state no longer has authorization to receive any support payments, the county child support enforcement unit shall notify the clerk of the court to stop sending the support payments to the county and to send the support payments directly to the obligee.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 527, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-17.

L. 77:

(4) amended, p. 824, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 724, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(7) added, p. 632, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1414, § 13, effective June 8.

L. 98:

(1), (2), (3), (4), and (7) amended, p. 756, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 1091, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(5) and (6) repealed, p. 498, § 1, effective August 8.

14-10-118. Enforcement of orders.

Repealed.

The court has the power to require security to be given to insure enforcement of its orders, in addition to other methods of enforcing court orders prescribed by statute or by the Colorado rules of civil procedure on or after July 6, 1973.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 528, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-18.

L. 73:

p. 554, § 9.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 909, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 280, § 3, effective April 7.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 595, § 25, effective July 10.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 577, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1871, § 5, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1252, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) repealed, p. 598, § 8, effective July 1.

14-10-119. Attorney's fees.

The court from time to time, after considering the financial resources of both parties, may order a party to pay a reasonable amount for the cost to the other party of maintaining or defending any proceeding under this article and for attorney's fees, including sums for legal services rendered and costs incurred prior to the commencement of the proceeding or after entry of judgment. The court may order that the amount be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in his name.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 528, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-19.

Cross references:

For allowance of attorney fees generally, see C.R.C.P. 3(a), 30(g), 37(a), 37(c), 56(g), and 107(d); for awarding of attorney fees in civil actions generally, see § 13-17-102.

14-10-120. Decree.

A decree of dissolution of marriage or of legal separation is final when entered, subject to the right of appeal. An appeal from the decree of dissolution that does not challenge the finding that the marriage is irretrievably broken does not delay the finality of that provision of the decree which dissolves the marriage beyond the time for appealing from that provision, so that either of the parties may remarry pending appeal.

No earlier than one hundred eighty-two days after entry of a decree of legal separation, on motion of either party and proof that a notice has been mailed to the other party at his or her last-known address, the court shall convert the decree of legal separation to a decree of dissolution of marriage, and a copy thereof shall be mailed to both parties.

The clerk of the court shall give notice of the entry of a decree of dissolution to the office of state registrar of vital statistics in the division of administration of the department of public health and environment, which office shall make this information available to the public upon request.

No decree that may enter shall relieve a spouse from any obligation imposed by law as a result of the marriage for the support or maintenance of a spouse determined to be mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction prior to the decree, unless such spouse has sufficient property or means of support.

Whenever child support has been ordered, the decree of dissolution, legal separation, declaration of invalidity, allocating parental responsibilities, or support shall contain an order for an income assignment pursuant to section 14-14-111.5.

Notwithstanding the entry of a final decree of dissolution of marriage or of legal separation pursuant to this section, the district court may maintain jurisdiction to enter such temporary or permanent civil protection orders as may be provided by law upon request of any of the parties to the action for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, including, but not limited to, any protection order requested pursuant to section 14-10-108.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 528, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-20.

L. 75:

(3) R&RE, p. 585, § 1, effective May 31; (4) amended, p. 925, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 825, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 85:

(5) added, p. 592, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) amended, p. 1539, § 6, effective May 31; (3) amended, p. 2731, § 348, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 622, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(5) amended, p. 1399, § 44, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(6) added, p. 500, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(6) amended, p. 1012, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 831, § 27, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

14-10-120.2. Ex-parte request for restoration of prior name of party.

Pursuant to the provisions of this section, at any time after the entry of a decree of dissolution or legal separation, a party to the action may request restoration of a prior full name.

The requesting party must file a verified motion and affidavit under the same case number in the district court in which the decree of dissolution or legal separation was entered. The requesting party's motion and affidavit must include:

The caption and case number for the action in which the decree of dissolution or legal separation was entered; and

The requesting party's sworn statement that the restoration of a prior full name is not detrimental to any person.

The court shall enter an order restoring the requesting party's name if the court determines that:

The court entered a decree of dissolution or legal separation in an action concerning the requesting party; and

The request to restore a prior full name is not detrimental to any person.

The order restoring a prior full name of the party does not affect any party's rights or obligations pursuant to the decree of dissolution or legal separation entered in the action.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1085), ch. 55, p. 133, § 1, effective September 1.

14-10-120.3. Dissolution of marriage or legal separation upon affidavit - requirements.

Final orders in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation may be entered upon the affidavit of either or both parties when:

There are no minor children of the husband and wife and the wife is not pregnant or the husband and wife are both represented by counsel and have entered into a separation agreement that provides for the allocation of parental responsibilities concerning the children of the marriage and setting out the amount of child support to be provided by the husband or wife or both; and

The adverse party is served in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure; and

There is no genuine issue as to any material fact; and

There is no marital property to be divided or the parties have entered into an agreement for the division of their marital property.

If one party desires to submit the matter for entry of final orders upon an affidavit, the submitting party shall file his or her affidavit setting forth sworn testimony showing the court's jurisdiction and factual averments supporting the relief requested in the proceeding together with a copy of the proposed decree, a copy of any separation agreement proposed for adoption by the court, and any other supporting evidence. The filing of the affidavit does not shorten any statutory waiting period required for entry of a decree of dissolution or decree of legal separation.

The court shall not be bound to enter a decree upon the affidavits of either or both parties, but the court may, upon its own motion, require that a formal hearing be held to determine any or all issues presented by the pleadings.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 303, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 98:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1399, § 45, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2012:

IP(1) and (2) amended, (HB 12-1233), ch. 52, p. 187, § 2, effective July 1.

14-10-120.5. Petition - fee - assessment - displaced homemakers fund.

There shall be assessed against a nonindigent petitioner a fee of five dollars for each filing of a petition for dissolution of marriage, declaration of invalidity of marriage, legal separation, or declaratory judgment concerning the status of marriage. All such fees collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the displaced homemakers fund created pursuant to section 8-15.5-108, C.R.S.

(1.5) There shall be assessed against a nonindigent petitioner a fee of five dollars for each filing of a petition for dissolution of a civil union, declaration of invalidity of a civil union, legal separation, or declaratory judgment concerning the status of a civil union. All such fees collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the displaced homemakers fund created pursuant to section 8-15.5-108, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fee in subsection (1) or (1.5) of this section, the chief justice of the supreme court by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the chief justice by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 455, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1330, § 40, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-038), ch. 119, p. 498, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 163, § 15, effective May 1.

Cross references:

For the docket fees for dissolution of marriage actions, see § 13-32-101.

14-10-121. Independence of provisions of decree or temporary order.

If a party fails to comply with a provision of a decree or temporary order or injunction, the obligation of the other party to make payments for support or maintenance or to permit parenting time is not suspended; but said party may move the court to grant an appropriate order.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 529, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-21.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.